Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.130

Obtaining information under false pretenses—Penalty.

A person who knowingly and willfully obtains information on a consumer from a consumer reporting agency under false pretenses is subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars or imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

[ 2011 c 96 s 21; 1993 c 476 s 15.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.